Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-103.16
Hotel, defined.

Hotel means any building or other structure
(1) which is kept, used, maintained, advertised, and held out to the public
to be a place where food is actually served and consumed and sleeping accommodations
are offered for adequate pay to travelers and guests, whether transient, permanent,
or residential, (2) in which twenty-five or more rooms are used for the sleeping
accommodations of such guests, and (3) which has one or more public dining
rooms where meals are served to such guests, such sleeping accommodations
and dining rooms being conducted in the same buildings in connection therewith
and such building or buildings or structure or structures being provided with
adequate and sanitary kitchen and dining room equipment and capacity.

Laws 2010, LB861, § 24.